Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-887.03
Auctioneers; nonresident; additional
requirements.

Nothing contained in sections 81-887.01 to
81-887.03 shall be construed to permit any person to conduct a sale of real
estate without first complying with the requirements of the Nebraska Real Estate License Act.

Laws 1953, c. 339, § 3, p. 1112;

Laws 2009, LB30, § 15.

Nebraska Real Estate License Act, see section 81-885.